Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2489
Funds appropriated and distributed; reports on use.

The regional behavioral health authorities and local public health departments shall report on or before November 1 of each even-numbered year to the division regarding the use of funds distributed for purposes of the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act and the outcomes achieved from the use of such funds. The division shall report annually on or before December 31 to the Legislature, the Governor, and the Attorney General regarding the use of funds appropriated and distributed under the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act and the outcomes achieved from the use of such funds. The reports submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2020, LB1124, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 22.